Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2207.28
Evaluation assignment, defined.

Evaluation assignment means an assignment that relates to the nature, quality, or utility of identified real estate or identified real property and typically does not include an opinion of value. Evaluation assignment does not include reports prepared by experts from professional disciplines other than real property appraisal such as: A soil test or soil analysis of identified real estate prepared by a civil engineer; a title opinion or zoning analysis of identified real estate prepared by a lawyer; an architectural analysis of identified improved real estate prepared by an architect; and a property management analysis of identified improved real estate prepared by a property manager or property management consultant.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 13;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 76-2212;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.12;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 17.